Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-235.01
Hospital; terms, defined.

As used in sections 15-235.01 to 15-235.05, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Governmental subdivision shall mean any city of the primary class and also any county in which a city of the primary class is the county seat thereof;

(2) Hospital shall mean any hospital organized pursuant to section 15-231, or any hospital or hospital facility established by a governmental subdivision in conjunction with or adjoining a hospital organized pursuant to section 15-231.

Laws 1961, c. 38, § 1, p. 165.